Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3614
Annual assessment; levy; rule; audit.

(a) The interstate commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the interstate commission and its staff. The total assessment must be sufficient to cover the annual budget approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated upon a formula to be determined by the interstate commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

(b) The interstate commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same.

(c) The interstate commission shall not pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by, and with the authority of, the member state.

(d) The interstate commission shall be subject to a yearly financial audit conducted by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in the annual report of the interstate commission.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 14.